Virginia statutes. Title 13.1. Corporations.
Article 15. Appraisal Rights and Other Remedies.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

4B M.J. Corporations, § 135.

§ 13.1-729.
Definitions.

As used in this article:

“Affiliate”
means a person who directly or indirectly through one or more intermediaries controls, is controlled by, or is under common control with another person or is a senior executive officer of such person. For purposes of subdivision B 4 of §

13.1-730

, a person is deemed to be an affiliate of its senior executives.

“Beneficial shareholder”
means a person who is the beneficial owner of shares held in a voting trust or by a nominee on the beneficial owner’s behalf.

“Corporation”
means the domestic corporation that is the issuer of the shares held by a shareholder demanding appraisal and, for matters covered by §§

13.1-734

through

13.1-740

, includes the survivor in a merger.

“Fair value”
means the value of the corporation’s shares determined:

Immediately before the effectiveness of the corporate action to which the shareholder objects;

Using customary and current valuation concepts and techniques generally employed for similar businesses in the context of the transaction requiring appraisal; and

Without discounting for lack of marketability or minority status except, if appropriate, for amendments to the articles of incorporation pursuant to subdivision A 5 of §

13.1-730

.

“Interest”
means interest from the date the corporate action becomes effective until the date of payment, at the average rate currently paid by the corporation on its principal bank loans or, if none, at a rate that is fair and equitable under all the circumstances.

“Interested transaction”
means a corporate action described in subsection A of §

13.1-730

, other than a merger pursuant to §

13.1-719

or

13.1-719.1

, involving an interested person in which any of the shares or assets of the corporation are being acquired or converted. As used in this definition:

Was the beneficial owner of 20 percent or more of the voting power of the corporation, excluding any shares acquired pursuant to an offer for all shares of the corporation having voting power if the offer was made within one year prior to the corporate action for consideration of the same kind and of a value equal to or less than that paid in connection with the corporate action;

Excluding the voting power of any shares of the corporation acquired pursuant to an offer for all shares having voting power if the offer was made within the previous one year for consideration of the same kind and of a value equal to or less than that paid in connection with the corporate action, had the power, contractually or otherwise, to cause the appointment or election of 25 percent or more of the directors to the board of directors of the corporation; or

Was a senior executive officer or director of the corporation or a senior executive officer of any affiliate of the corporation, and that senior executive officer or director will receive, as a result of the corporate action, a financial benefit not generally available to other shareholders as such, other than:

Employment, consulting, retirement, or similar benefits established separately and not as part of or in contemplation of the corporate action;

Employment, consulting, retirement, or similar benefits established in contemplation of, or as part of, the corporate action that are not more favorable than those existing before the corporate action or, if more favorable, that have been approved on behalf of the corporation in the same manner as is provided in §

13.1-691

; or

In the case of a director of the corporation who will, in the corporate action, become a director of the acquiring entity in the corporate action or one of its affiliates, rights and benefits as a director that are provided on the same basis as those afforded by the acquiring entity generally to other directors of such entity or such affiliate.

“Preferred shares”
means a class or series of shares whose holders have preference over any other class or series of shares with respect to distributions.

“Senior executive”
means the chief executive officer, chief operating officer, chief financial officer and anyone in charge of a principal business unit or function.

“Shareholder”
means a record shareholder, a beneficial shareholder, and a voting trust beneficial owner.

1.

“Beneficial owner” means any person who, directly or indirectly, through any contract, arrangement, or understanding, other than a revocable proxy, has or shares the power to vote, or to direct the voting of, shares; except that a member of a national securities exchange is not deemed to be a beneficial owner of securities held directly or indirectly by it on behalf of another person solely because the member is the record holder of the securities if the member is precluded by the rules of the exchange from voting without instruction on contested matters or matters that may affect substantially the rights or privileges of the holders of the securities to be voted. When two or more persons agree to act together for the purpose of voting their shares of the corporation, each member of the group formed thereby is deemed to have acquired beneficial ownership, as of the date of the agreement, of all voting shares of the corporation beneficially owned by any member of the group.

2.

“Interested person” means a person, or an affiliate of a person, who at any time during the one-year period immediately preceding approval by the board of directors of the corporate action:

History.

1985, c. 522; 1992, c. 575; 2005, c. 765; 2007, c. 165; 2019, c. 734.

Cross references.

As to reclassification or conversion of banking institution shares, see §

6.2-105

.

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendment by c. 765 substituted “Appraisal Rights” for “Dissenters’ Rights” in the title of this Article 15; added the paragraphs defining “Affiliate” and “Beneficial shareholder”; rewrote the paragraphs defining “Corporation” and “Dissenter”; substituted “means the value of the corporation’s shares determined” for “with respect to a dissenter’s shares, means the value of the shares immediately” in the paragraph defining “Fair value”; in paragraphs under the definition of “Fair value,” substituted “Immediately before the effectuation of the corporate action to which the shareholder objects” for “before the effectuation of the corporate action to which the dissenter object, excluding any appreciation or depreciation in anticipation of the corporate action unless exclusion would be inequitable” in paragraph a, and added paragraphs b and c; added the paragraph defining “Preferred shares”; deleted the paragraph defining “Beneficial shareholder”; added the paragraph defining “Senior executive officer”; and substituted “means both a record shareholder and a beneficial shareholder” for “means the record shareholder or the beneficial shareholder” in the paragraph defining “Shareholder.”

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendment by c. 165 added “and Other Remedies” at the end of the Article 15 heading; deleted the former second sentence of the definition of “Affiliate”; and added the definition of “Interested transaction.”

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendment by c. 734 inserted “As used” at the beginning of the introductory language; in the definition for “Affiliate,” substituted “of such person. For purposes of subdivision B 4 of §

13.1-730

, a person is deemed to be an affiliate of its senior executives” for “thereof”; in the definition for “Corporation,” inserted “domestic corporation that is the” preceding “issuer of,” and substituted “survivor” for “surviving entity”; in subdivision 1 of the definition for “Fair value,” substituted “effectiveness” for “effectuation”; in subdivision 3, inserted “of incorporation” following “articles”; in the definition for “Interested transaction,” in subdivision 2 a., inserted “of the corporation” following “all shares”; rewrote subdivision 2 b., which read: “Had the power, contractually or otherwise, to cause the appointment or election of 25% or more of the directors to the board of directors of the corporation; or”; in subdivision 2 c., substituted “of the corporation” for “thereof”; deleted the definition for “Record shareholder,” which read: “ ‘Record shareholder’ means the person in whose name shares are registered in the records of the corporation or the beneficial owner of shares to the extent of the rights granted by a nominee certificate on file with the corporation”; substituted “ ‘Senior executive’ ” for “ ‘Senior executive officer’ ”; and rewrote the definition for “Shareholder,” which read: “ ‘Shareholder’ means both a record shareholder and a beneficial shareholder”; and made stylistic changes.

Law Review.

For article, “The New Virginia Stock Corporation Act: A Primer,” see 20 U. Rich. L. Rev. 67 (1985).

For article, “Virginia’s ‘Affiliated Transactions’ Statute: Indulging Form Over Substance in Second Generation Takeover Legislation,” see 21 U. Rich. L. Rev. 489 (1987).

For 2007 annual survey article, “Corporate and Business Law,” see 42 U. Rich. L. Rev. 273 (2007).

For article, “Corporate and Business Law,” see 54 U. Rich. L. Rev. 73 (2019).

§ 13.1-730.
Right to appraisal.

A shareholder is entitled to appraisal rights, and to obtain payment of the fair value of that shareholder’s shares, in the event of any of the following corporate actions:

Consummation of a merger to which the corporation is a party (i) if shareholder approval is required for the merger by §

13.1-718

, or would be required but for the provisions of subsection G of §

13.1-718

, except that appraisal rights shall not be available to any shareholder of the corporation with respect to shares of any class or series that remain outstanding after consummation of the merger or (ii) if the corporation is a subsidiary and the merger is governed by §

13.1-719

;

Consummation of a share exchange in which the corporation is the acquired entity, except that appraisal rights shall not be available to any shareholder of the corporation with respect to shares of any class or series that are not acquired in the share exchange;

Consummation of a disposition of assets pursuant to §

13.1-724

if the disposition of assets is an interested transaction;

An amendment of the articles of incorporation with respect to a class or series of shares that reduces the number of shares of a class or series owned by the shareholder to a fraction of a share if the corporation has the obligation or right to repurchase the fractional share so created;

Any other merger, share exchange, disposition of assets, or amendment of the articles of incorporation, in each case to the extent provided by the articles of incorporation, bylaws, or a resolution of the board of directors;

Consummation of a domestication in which a domestic corporation becomes a foreign corporation if the shareholder does not receive shares in the foreign corporation resulting from the domestication that have terms as favorable to the shareholder in all material respects, and represent at least the same percentage interest in the total voting rights of the outstanding shares of the foreign corporation, as the shares held by the shareholder immediately before the domestication; or

Consummation of a conversion to an unincorporated entity pursuant to Article 12.2 (§

13.1-722.8

et seq.).

Notwithstanding subsection A, the availability of appraisal rights under subdivisions A 1 through A 4, A 6, and A 7 shall be limited in accordance with the following provisions:

Appraisal rights shall not be available for the holders of shares of any class or series of shares that is:

A covered security under § 18(b)(1)(A) or (B) of the federal Securities Act of 1933;

Traded in an organized market and has at least 2,000 shareholders and a market value of at least $20 million, exclusive of the value of such shares held by the corporation’s subsidiaries, senior executives, and directors and by any beneficial shareholder or any voting trust beneficial owner owning more than 10 percent of such shares; or

Issued by an open end management investment company registered with the U.S. Securities and Exchange Commission under the federal Investment Company Act of 1940 and that may be redeemed at the option of the holder at net asset value.

The applicability of subdivision 1 shall be determined as of:

Subdivision 1 shall not be applicable and appraisal rights shall be available pursuant to subsection A for the holders of any class or series of shares who are required by the terms of the corporate action requiring appraisal rights to accept for such shares anything other than cash or shares of any class or any series of shares of any corporation, or any other proprietary interest of any other entity, that satisfies the standards set forth in subdivision 1 at the time the corporate action becomes effective.

Subdivision 1 shall not be applicable and appraisal rights shall be available pursuant to subsection A for the holders of any class or series of shares where the corporate action is an interested transaction.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, the articles of incorporation as originally filed or any amendment to the articles of incorporation may limit or eliminate appraisal rights for any class or series of preferred shares, except that (i) no such limitation or elimination shall be effective if the class or series does not have the right to vote separately as a voting group, alone or as a part of a group, on the action, and (ii) any such limitation or elimination contained in an amendment of the articles of incorporation that limits or eliminates appraisal rights for any of such shares that are outstanding immediately prior to the effective date of such amendment or that the corporation is or may be required to issue or sell thereafter pursuant to any conversion, exchange or other right existing immediately before the effective date of such amendment shall not apply to any corporate action that becomes effective within one year after the effective date of such amendment if such action would otherwise afford appraisal rights.

a.

The record date fixed to determine the shareholders entitled to receive notice of the meeting of shareholders to act upon the corporate action requiring appraisal rights or in the case of an offer made pursuant to subsection G of §

13.1-718

, the date of such offer; or

b.

The day before the effective date of such corporate action if there is no meeting of shareholders and no offer made pursuant to subsection G of §

13.1-718

.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 13-85, 13.1-75, 13.1-78; 1956, c. 428; 1968, c. 733; 1972, c. 425; 1975, c. 500; 1984, c. 613; 1985, c. 522; 1986, c. 540; 1988, c. 442; 1990, c. 229; 1992, c. 575; 1996, c. 246; 1999, c. 288; 2005, c. 765; 2007, c. 165; 2010, c. 782; 2015, c. 611; 2019, c. 734.

Cross references.

As to effect of entity conversion under the Virginia Business Trust Act, see §

13.1-1276

.

Editor’s note.

For § 18(b)(1)(A) or (B) of the federal Securities Act, referred to in subsection B above, see
15 U.S.C.S. § 77r. For the Investment Company Act of 1940, referred to above, see
15 U.S.C.S. § 80a-1 et seq.

Acts
2019, c. 734, cl. 4, as amended by Acts
2020, c. 1226, cl. 5 provides: “That until July 1, 2021, the term ‘conversion,’ when used in any provision of the first enactment of this act, shall be construed to mean ‘entity conversion.’ ”

The 1999 amendment

added subsection E.

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendment by c. 765 rewrote the section.

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendment by c. 165 rewrote subdivisions B 1 and B 4, and deleted former subsection D regarding limitations on a shareholder’s right to challenge corporate action.

The 2010 amendments.

The 2010 amendment by c. 782 deleted “and the shareholder is entitled to vote on the merger” following “merger by §

13.1-718

” in subdivision A 1; deleted “if the shareholder is entitled to vote on the exchange” following “will be acquired” in subdivision A 2; inserted “or any other” in subdivision A 5; and inserted “United States” in subdivision B 1 c.

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendment by c. 611 substituted “or would be required but for the provisions of subsection G of §

13.1-718

; however” for “except that” in subdivision A 1; rewrote subdivision A 3, which read “Consummation of a disposition of assets pursuant to §

13.1-724

if the shareholder is entitled to vote on the disposition”; added subdivision A 6; deleted “of this subsection” preceding “subdivision 1” throughout subsection B; and made stylistic changes.

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendment by c. 734, in subdivision A 1, substituted “except that” for “however”; rewrote subdivisions A 2 and 3 regarding consummation; rewrote subdivision A 5, which read: “Any other amendment to the articles of incorporation, or any other merger, share exchange or disposition of assets to the extent provided by the articles of incorporation, bylaws, or a resolution of the board of directors; or”; in subdivision A 6, substituted “foreign” for “domestic”; added subdivision A 7; in subsection B, inserted “A 6, and A 7” preceding “shall be”; in subdivision B 1 a., deleted “as amended” at the end; in subdivision B 1 b., substituted “and directors and by any beneficial shareholder or any voting trust beneficial owner owning” for “directors and beneficial shareholders owning”; in subdivision B 1 c., inserted “federal” following “under the”; in subdivision B 2 a., inserted “or in the case of an offer made pursuant to subsection G of §

13.1-718

, the date of such offer” following “appraisal rights”; in subdivision B 2 b., added “and no offer made pursuant to subsection G of §

13.1-718

” at the end; and rewrote subsection C regarding appraisal rights; and made stylistic changes.

Law Review.

For article, “Virginia’s ‘Affiliated Transactions’ Statute: Indulging Form Over Substance in Second Generation Takeover Legislation,” see 21 U. Rich. L. Rev. 489 (1987).

For article reviewing changes in Virginia corporate and business law from June 2001 through May 2002, see 37 U. Rich. L. Rev. 1 (2002).

For 2007 annual survey article, “Corporate and Business Law,” see 42 U. Rich. L. Rev. 273 (2007).

§ 13.1-731.
Assertion of rights by nominees and beneficial owners.

A record shareholder may assert appraisal rights as to fewer than all the shares registered in the record shareholder’s name but owned by a beneficial shareholder or a voting trust beneficial owner only if the record shareholder objects with respect to all shares of the class or series owned by the beneficial shareholder or the voting trust beneficial owner and notifies the corporation in writing of the name and address of each beneficial shareholder or voting trust beneficial owner on whose behalf appraisal rights are being asserted. The rights of a record shareholder who asserts appraisal rights for only part of the shares held of record in the record shareholder’s name under this subsection shall be determined as if the shares as to which the record shareholder objects and the record shareholder’s other shares were registered in the names of different record shareholders.

A beneficial shareholder or a voting trust beneficial owner may assert appraisal rights as to shares of any class or series held on behalf of the shareholder only if such shareholder:

Submits to the corporation the record shareholder’s written consent to the assertion of such rights no later than the date referred to in subdivision B 2 b of §

13.1-734

; and

Does so with respect to all shares of the class or series that are beneficially owned by the beneficial shareholder or the voting trust beneficial owner.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 13-85, 13.1-75, 13.1-78; 1956, c. 428; 1968, c. 733; 1972, c. 425; 1975, c. 500; 1984, c. 613; 1985, c. 522; 2005, c. 765; 2019, c. 734.

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendment by c. 765 rewrote this section.

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendment by c. 734 inserted “voting trust beneficial owner” throughout; and made stylistic changes.

§ 13.1-732.
Notice of appraisal rights.

Where any corporate action specified in subsection A of §

13.1-730

is to be submitted to a vote at a shareholders’ meeting and the corporation has concluded that shareholders are or may be entitled to assert appraisal rights under this article, the meeting notice, or when no approval of such action is required pursuant to subsection G of §

13.1-718

, the offer made pursuant to subsection G of §

13.1-718

shall state the corporation’s position as to the availability of appraisal rights.If the corporation concludes that appraisal rights are or may be available, a copy of this article shall accompany the meeting notice or offer sent to those record shareholders who are or may be entitled to exercise appraisal rights.

In a merger pursuant to §

13.1-719

, the parent entity shall notify in writing all record shareholders of the subsidiary who are entitled to assert appraisal rights that the corporate action became effective. Such notice shall be sent within 10 days after the corporate action became effective and include the materials described in §

13.1-734

.

Where any corporate action specified in subsection A of §

13.1-730

is to be approved by written consent of the shareholders pursuant to §

13.1-657

and the corporation has concluded that shareholders are or may be entitled to assert appraisal rights under this article:

Written notice stating the corporation’s position as to the availability of appraisal rights shall be given to each record shareholder from whom a consent is solicited at the time consent of such shareholder is first solicited and shall be accompanied by a copy of this article; and

Written notice stating the corporation’s position as to the availability of appraisal rights shall be delivered together with the notice to nonconsenting and nonvoting shareholders required by subsections H and I of §

13.1-657

, may include the materials described in §

13.1-734

, and shall be accompanied by a copy of this article.

Where corporate action described in subsection A of §

13.1-730

is proposed, or a merger pursuant to §

13.1-719

is effected, the notice referred to in subsection A, B, or C shall be accompanied by:

The annual financial statements specified in subsection A of §

13.1-774

of the corporation that issued the shares that may be subject to appraisal, which shall be as of a date ending not more than 16 months before the date of the notice and shall comply with subsection B of §

13.1-774

; provided that, if such annual financial statements are not reasonably available, the corporation shall provide reasonably equivalent financial information; and

The latest available quarterly financial statements of such corporation, if any.

A public corporation, or a corporation that ceased to be a public corporation as a result of the corporate action specified in subsection A of §

13.1-730

, may fulfill its responsibilities under subsection D by delivering the specified financial statements, or otherwise making them available, in any manner permitted by the applicable rules and regulations of the U.S. Securities and Exchange Commission if the corporation was a public corporation as of the date of the specified financial statements.

The right to receive the information described in subsection D may be waived in writing by a shareholder before or after the corporate action.

History.

1985, c. 522; 2005, c. 765; 2007, c. 165; 2012, c. 706; 2015, c. 611; 2019, c. 734.

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendment by c. 765 rewrote this section.

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendment by c. 165 substituted “Where any corporate action specified in subsection A” for “If proposed corporate action described in subsection A” at the beginning of subsection A, and added subsections C through E.

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendment by c. 706 added subsection E and redesignated former E as F.

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendment by c. 611 rewrote subsection A, which read “Where any corporate action specified in subsection A of §

13.1-730

is to be submitted to a vote at a shareholders’ meeting, the meeting notice shall state that the corporation has concluded that shareholders are, are not or may be entitled to assert appraisal rights under this article. If the corporation concludes that appraisal rights are or may be available, a copy of this article and a statement of the corporation’s position as to the availability of appraisal rights shall accompany the meeting notice sent to those record shareholders entitled to exercise appraisal rights.”; and substituted “F and G” for “E and F” in subdivision C 2.

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendment by c. 734 rewrote the section.

§ 13.1-733.
Notice of intent to demand payment.

If a corporate action specified in subsection A of §

13.1-730

is submitted to a vote at a shareholders’ meeting, a shareholder who wishes to assert appraisal rights with respect to any class or series of shares:

Must deliver to the corporation’s secretary before the vote is taken written notice of the shareholder’s intent to demand payment if the proposed action is effectuated; and

Must not vote, or cause or permit to be voted, any shares of such class or series in favor of the proposed action.

If a corporate action specified in subsection A of §

13.1-730

is to be approved by shareholders by written consent, a shareholder who wishes to assert appraisal rights with respect to any class or series of shares:

Shall deliver to the corporation’s secretary before the proposed action becomes effective written notice of the shareholder’s intent to demand payment if the proposed action is effectuated, except that such written notice is not required if the notice required by subsection C of §

13.1-732

is given less than 25 days prior to the date such proposed action is effectuated; and

Shall not sign a consent in favor of the proposed action with respect to that class or series of shares.

If a corporate action specified in subsection A of §

13.1-730

does not require shareholder approval pursuant to subsection G of §

13.1-718

, a shareholder who wishes to assert appraisal rights with respect to any class or series of shares (i) shall deliver to the secretary of the corporation before the shares are purchased pursuant to the offer written notice of the shareholder’s intent to demand payment if the proposed action is effectuated; and (ii) shall not tender, or cause or permit to be tendered, any shares of such class or series in response to such offer.

A shareholder who fails to satisfy the requirements of subsection A, B, or C is not entitled to payment under this article.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 13-85, 13.1-75, 13.1-78; 1956, c. 428; 1968, c. 733; 1972, c. 425; 1975, c. 500; 1984, c. 613; 1985, c. 522; 2005, c. 765; 2007, c. 165; 2010, c. 782; 2015, c. 611; 2019, c. 734.

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendment by c. 765, in subsection A, substituted “requiring appraisal rights” for “creating dissenter’s rights” and “to assert appraisal rights with respect to any class or series of shares” for “to assert dissenters’ rights (i) shall”; in subdivision A 1, added “Shall” to the beginning, substituted “the shareholder’s intent” for “his intent,” deleted “for his shares” following “demand payment,” and deleted “(ii) shall” from the end; in subdivision A 2, substituted “Shall not vote or cause or permit to be voted, any shares of such class or series” for “not vote such”; and in subsection B, deleted “of this section” following “subsection A” and “for his shares” preceding “under this article.”

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendment by c. 165 substituted “If a corporate action specified in subsection A of §

13.1-730

” for “If proposed corporate action requiring appraisal rights under §

13.1-730

” at the beginning of subsection A, added present subsection B, redesignated former subsection B as present subsection C, substituted “who fails to satisfy” for “who does not satisfy” and inserted “or subsection B” in subsection C, and made minor stylistic changes.

The 2010 amendments.

The 2010 amendment by c. 782 substituted “sign” for “execute” in subsection B.

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendment by c. 611 in subsection B, substituted “shareholders by” for “less than unanimous,” and redesignated the end of the subsection as subdivision B 2, added subdivision B 1 and substituted “shall” for “may” in subdivision B 2; deleted “subsection” preceding “B” in subsection C; and made stylistic changes.

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendment by c. 734 substituted “corporation’s secretary” for “corporation” throughout; added subsection C; redesignated former subsection C as D; and in subsection D, substituted “A, B, or C” for “A or B.”

CIRCUIT COURT OPINIONS

Notice of dissent to share exchange. —

Although a minority shareholder did not send notice to a company by name, the minority shareholder’s letters to the majority shareholders put the company on notice that the minority shareholder dissented to a share exchange in accordance with §

13.1-733

; therefore, the company was not entitled to declaratory relief in the minority shareholder’s action for injunctive relief and the appointment of a custodian. Seligman v. Cass, 72 Va. Cir. 171, 2006 Va. Cir. LEXIS 206 (Roanoke Oct. 16, 2006).

§ 13.1-734.
Appraisal notice and form.

If a corporate action requiring appraisal rights under §

13.1-730

becomes effective, the corporation shall deliver a written appraisal notice and the form required by subdivision B 1 to all shareholders who satisfy the requirements of §

13.1-733

. In the case of a merger under §

13.1-719

, the parent corporation shall deliver an appraisal notice and form to all record shareholders who may be entitled to assert appraisal rights.

The appraisal notice shall be delivered no earlier than the date the corporate action specified in subsection A of §

13.1-730

became effective and no later than 10 days after such date and shall:

Supply a form that (i) specifies the first date of any announcement to shareholders made prior to the date the corporate action became effective of the principal terms of the proposed corporate action, (ii) if such announcement was made, requires the shareholder asserting appraisal rights to certify whether beneficial ownership of those shares for which appraisal rights are asserted was acquired before that date, and (iii) requires the shareholder asserting appraisal rights to certify that such shareholder did not vote for or consent to the transaction as to the class or series of shares for which appraisal is sought;

State:

Where the form must be delivered and where certificates for certificated shares are required to be deposited and the date by which those certificates must be deposited, which date may not be earlier than the date by which the corporation must receive the required form under subdivision b;

A date by which the corporation must receive the form, which date may not be fewer than 40 nor more than 60 days after the date the subsection A appraisal notice is delivered, and state that the shareholder shall have waived the right to demand appraisal with respect to the shares unless the form is received by the corporation by such specified date;

The corporation’s estimate of the fair value of the shares;

That, if requested in writing, the corporation will provide, to the shareholder so requesting, within 10 days after the date specified in subdivision b, the number of shareholders who return the forms by the specified date and the total number of shares owned by them; and

The date by which the notice to withdraw under §

13.1-735.1

must be received, which date must be within 20 days after the date specified in subdivision b; and

Be accompanied by a copy of this article.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 13-85, 13.1-75, 13.1-78; 1956, c. 428; 1968, c. 733; 1972, c. 425; 1975, c. 500; 1984, c. 613; 1985, c. 522; 2005, c. 765; 2007, c. 165; 2010, c. 782; 2012, c. 706; 2019, c. 734.

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendment by c. 765 rewrote this section.

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendment by c. 165 inserted “specified in subsection A of §

13.1-730

” in the introductory language of subsection B, rewrote subdivision B 1, and substituted “form” for “forms” near the end of subdivision B 2 d.

The 2010 amendments.

The 2010 amendment by c. 782 substituted “an appraisal” for “written appraisal” twice in subsection A.

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendment by c. 706 substituted “rights to certify” for “rights certify” in clause (ii) of subdivision B 1.

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendment by c. 734, in subsection A, substituted “a” for “proposed,” substituted “a written” for “an,” and substituted “satisfy” for “satisfied”; in subsection B and subdivision B 2 a., substituted “delivered” for “sent”; in subdivision B 1, added “as to the class or series of shares for which appraisal is sought” at the end; in subdivisions B 2 a., d., and e., substituted “subdivision b” for “subdivision 2 b of this subsection”; in subdivision B 2 a., substituted “are required to” for “must,” and substituted “by which the corporation must receive” for “for receiving”; in subdivision B 2 b., substituted “is delivered” for “and form were sent”; and in subsection B 2 d., substituted “return the forms” for “returned the forms.”

§ 13.1-735.
Repealed by Acts 2005, c. 765, cl. 2.

Editor’s note.

Former §

13.1-735

, relating to duty to demand payment, was derived from Code 1950, §§ 13-85, 13.1-75, 13.1-78; 1956, c. 428; 1968, c. 733; 1972, c. 425; 1975, c. 500; 1984, c. 613; 1985, c. 522.

§ 13.1-735.1.
Perfection of rights; right to withdraw.

A shareholder who receives notice pursuant to §

13.1-734

and who wishes to exercise appraisal rights must complete, sign, and return the form delivered by the corporation and, in the case of certificated shares, deposit the shareholder’s certificates in accordance with the terms of the notice by the date referred to in the notice pursuant to subdivision B 2 b of §

13.1-734

. In addition, if applicable, the shareholder shall certify on the form whether the beneficial owner of such shares acquired beneficial ownership of the shares before the date required to be set forth in the notice pursuant to subdivision B 1 of § 13.1-734. If a shareholder fails to make this certification, the corporation may elect to treat the shareholder’s shares as after-acquired shares under §

13.1-738

. Once a shareholder deposits that shareholder’s certificates or, in the case of uncertificated shares, returns the signed form, that shareholder loses all rights as a shareholder, unless the shareholder withdraws pursuant to subsection B.

A shareholder who has complied with subsection A may nevertheless decline to exercise appraisal rights and withdraw from the appraisal process by so notifying the secretary of the corporation in writing by the date set forth in the appraisal notice pursuant to subdivision B 2 e of §

13.1-734

. A shareholder who fails to withdraw from the appraisal process may not thereafter withdraw without the corporation’s written consent.

A shareholder who does not sign and return the form and, in the case of certificated shares, deposit that shareholder’s share certificates where required, each by the date set forth in the notice described in subsection B of §

13.1-734

, shall not be entitled to payment under this article.

History.

2005, c. 765; 2007, c. 165; 2019, c. 734.

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendment by c. 165 rewrote subsection A and substituted “does not sign and return” for “does not execute and return” in subsection C.

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendment by c. 734, in subsection A, substituted “delivered” for “sent,” and substituted “In addition, if applicable, the shareholder shall certify on the form whether” for “If the form requires the shareholder to certify whether”; in subsection B, inserted “secretary of the” preceding “corporation”; and made stylistic changes.

§ 13.1-736.
Repealed by Acts 2005, c. 765, cl. 2.

§ 13.1-737.
Payment.

Except as provided in §

13.1-738

, within 30 days after the form required by subsection B 2 b of §

13.1-734

is due, the corporation shall pay in cash to those shareholders who complied with subsection A of §

13.1-735.1

the amount the corporation estimates to be the fair value of their shares plus interest.

The payment to each shareholder pursuant to subsection A shall be accompanied by:

The (i) annual financial statements specified in subsection A of §

13.1-774

of the corporation that issued the shares to be appraised, which shall be as of a date ending not more than 16 months before the date of payment and shall comply with subsection B of §

13.1-774

; provided that, if such annual financial statements are not available, the corporation shall provide reasonably equivalent financial information, and (ii) the latest available quarterly financial statements of such corporation, if any;

A statement of the corporation’s estimate of the fair value of the shares, which estimate shall equal or exceed the corporation’s estimate given pursuant to subdivision B 2 c of §

13.1-734

; and

A statement that shareholders described in subsection A have the right to demand further payment under §

13.1-739

and that if any such shareholder does not do so within the time period specified in subsection B of §

13.1-739

, such shareholder shall be deemed to have accepted such payment under subsection A in full satisfaction of the corporation’s obligations under this article.

A public corporation, or a corporation that ceased to be a public corporation as a result of the corporate action specified in subsection A of §

13.1-730

, may fulfill its responsibilities under subdivision B 1 by delivering the specified financial statements, or otherwise making them available, in any manner permitted by the applicable rules and regulations of the U.S. Securities and Exchange Commission if the corporation was a public corporation as of the date of the specified financial statements.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 13-85, 13.1-75, 13.1-78; 1956, c. 428; 1968, c. 733; 1972, c. 425; 1975, c. 500; 1984, c. 613; 1985, c. 522; 2005, c. 765; 2007, c. 165; 2012, c. 706; 2019, c. 734.

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendment by c. 765 rewrote this section.

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendment by c. 165 rewrote subdivision B 1.

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendment by c. 706 added subsection C.

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendment by c. 734, in subdivision B 1, inserted “financial” preceding “information, and”; and in subdivision B 3, substituted “in subsection B of §

13.1-739

” for “therein,” and inserted “under subsection A” following “such payment.”

Law Review.

For survey article, “Corporate and Business Law,” see 48 U. Rich. L. Rev. 39 (2013).